Hawaii statutes.
§841-14 Autopsies and further
investigations. [(a)] If, in the opinion of the coroner, or of the
coroner's physician, or of the prosecuting attorney, or of the chief of police
(in the city and county of Honolulu), an autopsy of the remains of any human
body appearing to have come to death under any of the circumstances set forth
in section 841-3 is necessary in the interest of the public safety or welfare,
that person shall cause to have performed, such an autopsy. If, in the opinion
of the coroner's physician, a further or additional investigation as to the
cause of death is necessary, the coroner's physician may conduct the same or
have the same made, and the expenses thereof shall be paid by the county
concerned, and for this purpose, the coroner's physician shall have the duties
and powers conferred upon the coroner or deputy coroner by sections 841-4 to
841-8.

[(b)] Any law to the contrary notwithstanding,
the coroner's physician or medical examiner of any county (including the city
and county of Honolulu) may cause to have performed an autopsy to determine
cause of death upon the remains of any human body which is brought into or
found within the State and which appears to have come to death under any of the
circumstances set forth in section 841-3, even though such circumstances may
have occurred without the State. The coroner's physician or medical examiner
of any county (including the city and county of Honolulu) shall have the right
to retain tissues, including fetal material, of the body removed at the time of
autopsy to be used for necessary or advisable scientific investigation,
including research, teaching, and therapeutic purposes. [L 1941, c 288, pt of
§1; am L 1943, c 209, §1; RL 1945, §10913; am L 1949, c 355, §4; RL 1955,
§260-14; am L 1963, c 84, §1; am L 1967, c 188, §2; HRS §715-14; ren L 1972, c
9, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 23, §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next